Hawaii, session 2026, GM1367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii's public
school system is a foundational public asset that is facing
significant challenges. Projections from the Western Interstate
Commission for Higher Education indicate that Hawaii is expected
to experience the nation's steepest decline in high school
graduates over the next sixteen years, with enrollment decreases
likely to accelerate.
The legislature further finds that, while statewide public
school enrollment today is nearly the same as it was in 1961,
the number of schools has increased by approximately twenty per
cent. Decades of enrollment growth led to the construction of
new campuses, but the recent and continuing decline in student
numbers has left many facilities underutilized. This imbalance
has created operational inefficiencies and diverted resources
that could otherwise be used to support student learning or
modernize facilities in high-need areas. The legislature also
finds that prior efforts to consolidate or close schools have
2026-3490 HB2344 GDI HMSO 1
■iioniiiiffliiiiHiiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
often been slow, inconsistent, and subject to political delay.
In light of declining enrollment, potential reductions in
federal funding, and the State's need for fiscal prudence, a
proactive and data-driven process is required to optimize the
public school system for the twenty-first century.
The legislature additionally finds that the federal Base
Realignment and Closure process provides a' proven and effective
model for making complex and politically sensitive
infrastructure decisions. By establishing an independent
commission and requiring an "all-or-nothing" vote on its
recommendations, the Base Realignment and Closure model ensures
that decisions are guided by objective data and the overall
public interest rather than localized political pressures.
The purpose of this Act is to establish a temporary,
independent public school realignment and closure commission to
review the State's public school facilities and recommend a
comprehensive package of consolidations, realignments, or
closures for an expedited, up-or-down approval process.
SECTION 2. (a) There is established a temporary public
school realignment and closure commission to be placed within
2026-3490 HB2344 CDl HMSO 2
lllilllHIIIIIHIIIIIIMIIIII

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the department of accounting and general services for
administrative purposes only.
(b) The commission shall consist of nine members appointed
for a term to expire upon the dissolution of the commission as
provided in this Act. The members shall comprise:
(1) One voting member appointed by the governor without
regard to section 26-34, Hawaii Revised Statutes;
(2) Two voting members appointed by the president of the
senate; and
(3) One voting member appointed by the minority leader of
the senate;
(4) Two voting members appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(5) One voting member appointed by the minority leader of
the house of representatives;
(6) The comptroller, or the comptroller's designee, who
shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member; and
(7) The superintendent of education, or the
superintendent's designee, who shall serve as an ex
officio, nonvoting member.
2026-3490 HB2344 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4 H.B. NO. SS*i
C.D. 1
The voting members of the commission shall elect a chairperson
from among the voting members.
(c) Each appointee shall have experience in one or more of
the following fields: public finance, urban planning, real
estate, education administration, or facilities management. No
person who is a current elected official; registered lobbyist;
or member or employee of the department of education, board of
education, school facilities authority, or school facilities
authority board shall be eligible to serve as a voting member of
the commission.
(d) The members shall serve without compensation but shall
be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary
for the performance of their duties.
(e) The department of accounting and general services
shall provide to the commission any administrative support the
department deems necessary to fulfill the duties of the
commission.
(f) The commission shall:
(1) Develop and adopt, after public hearings, a
comprehensive and objective set of criteria to be used
in evaluating public school facilities for potential
2026-3490 HB2344 CDl HMSO 4

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
consolidation, realignment, or closure. The criteria
shall include:
(A) The facility's:
(i) Current and projected student enrollment
data;
(ii) Condition, including any deferred
maintenance backlogs' or capital improvement
needs;
(iii) Annual operational costs and cost per pupil;
and
(iv) Building capacity and utilization rates;
(B) The geographic proximity and capacity of other
schools in the area;
(C) The potential for reuse, sale, or redevelopment
of school properties;
(D) Equity considerations, including the impact of a
potential consolidation, realignment, or closure
on students from disadvantaged communities;
(E) The academic needs of students, with specific
consideration for students receiving special
education services; and
2026-3490 HB2344 CDl HMSO
iiiiHiiiiiHiiniiiuin

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(F) The logistical feasibility of transition plans
for affected students and staff;
(2) Request and receive from the department of education,
school facilities authority, and any other state or
county agency any data necessary to conduct its
evaluation, including any existing reports, data, and
analyses from the department of education regarding
ongoing school consolidation efforts;
(3) Formally consult with the board of education during
the development of the criteria and the evaluation of
public school facilities to ensure educational
priorities are considered; and
(4) Conduct a statewide review of public school facilities
based on the criteria adopted pursuant to paragraph
(1) .
(g) The commission shall be subject to chapter 92, Hawaii
Revised Statutes.
(h) The commission shall prepare a preliminary report
containing its proposed recommendations for the consolidation,
realignment, or closure of specific public schools. Within one
hundred days of the appointment of all voting members to the
2026-3490 HB234.4 CDl HMSO
niiliiiiiiiiiiiiiiniiii

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
commission, the commission shall publish a public notice of the
preliminary report in each county.
(i) Following the initial public notice, the commission
shall hold at least one public hearing on the preliminary report
in each county. The commission shall provide at least twenty
days of advance notice prior to each public hearing. The notice
shall include a statement summarizing the substance of the
preliminary report and the date, time, and location where
interested persons may be heard.
(j) At each public hearing, all interested persons shall
be afforded an opportunity to submit data, views, or arguments,
either orally or in writing, for the commission to consider.
(k) Following the public hearings, the commission shall
issue a final report and comprehensive list of recommendations,
which may include a timeline for phased consolidations,
realignments, or closures. No later than October 1, 2028, the
commission shall file the final report with the governor,
president of the senate, speaker of the house of
representatives, and board of education.
(1) Upon filing of the final report pursuant to subsection
(k), the recommendations contained in the final report shall
2026-3490 HB2344 GDI HMSO
Biiiiiniiiiiniiiiniiii

Page 8 II |k । 2344
H.B. NO. i
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
become final and binding. No further approval by the- governor,
legislature, or board of education shall be required.
(m) The board of education and department of education
shall take all necessary actions to implement the binding
recommendations of the commission pursuant to this section no
later than October 1, 2029, and may implement the
recommendations in phases as outlined in the final report of the
commission.
SECTION 3. The board of education and department of
education shall cooperate with the commission and supply the
commission with any relevant information requested by the
commission.
SECTION 4. The public school realignment and closure
commission shall cease to exist on June 30, 2029.
SECTION 5. For the purposes of this Act:
"Commission" means the public school realignment and
closure commission established by this Act.
"Public school" shall have the same meaning as "department
school" as defined in section 302A-101, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
"Public school" does not include a charter school•governed by
chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
2026-3490 HB2344 CDl HMSO 8
■iiiiiinimiiiiiiinni

Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"Public school facilities" means facilities of a department
school as defined in section 302A-101, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
"Public school facilities" does not include facilities of a
charter school governed by chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised
Statutes.
SECTION 6. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $150,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
operational costs of the public school realignment and closure
commission.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2026;
provided that section 6 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3490 HB2344 CDl HMSO 9

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 15th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2344, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2344, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
149-26